Mississippi, session 2026, SB3386.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  As used in this act, unless a different meaning clearly appears in the context, the following terms shall have the following meanings: (a)  "Board" means the Board of Supervisors of DeSoto County, Mississippi. (b)  "County" means DeSoto County, Mississippi. (c)  "Golf cart" means a motor vehicle that is designated and manufactured for operation on a golf course for sporting or recreational purposes, is not capable of exceeding speeds of twenty (20) miles per hour, and is equipped with safety equipment as required under 49 CFR Section 571.500. (d)  "Low-speed vehicle" means any four-wheeled electric or gasoline-powered vehicle that has a top speed greater than twenty (20) miles per hour but less than twenty-five (25) miles per hour and is equipped with safety equipment as required under 49 CFR Section 571.500. (e) "Subdivision" means Buena Vista Lakes Subdivision in the county. SECTION 2.  (1)  The board may, in its discretion, authorize the operation of golf carts and low-speed vehicles only on the public roads and streets of the subdivision.  The authorization must be embodied in an ordinance or resolution and recorded on the minutes of the board.  The authorization may be accompanied by conditions not inconsistent with this act and may be revoked, in whole or in part, by the board at any time. (2)  Golf carts and low-speed vehicles may be operated on public roads and streets in the subdivision upon which bicycles are authorized by law to be operated.  Golf carts and low-speed vehicles may not be operated on state highways or federal highways that are not interstate highways except for the crossing of these streets, in which case the shortest traveling distance to do so shall be required.  Drivers are required to operate golf carts and low-speed vehicles only in the outside lane of multilane streets and roads, where applicable. (3)  Any person operating a golf cart or low-speed vehicle on the public roads and streets in the subdivision under this act must have in his or her possession a valid driver's license or temporary driver's permit and proof of financial responsibility as required under Section 63-15-1 et seq., Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 3.  (1) Every golf cart and low-speed vehicle to be operated, as authorized under this act, on a public road or street shall be required to be registered with the county.  Upon payment of a reasonable fee that may be charged by the county to cover the costs of administration, presentation of proof of financial responsibility and presentation of a valid driver's license or temporary driver's permit, the owner of the golf cart or low-speed vehicle shall be issued a registration decal by the county tax collector that must be displayed on the left rear fender of the vehicle.  The registration shall remain valid for as long as the registering owner owns the golf cart or low-speed vehicle. The county shall provide the registrant with a map of the areas where golf carts or low-speed vehicles may be operated at the time of registration. (2)  The registration fee imposed under subsection (1) of this section shall be retained by the chancery clerk and deposited into the county general fund. SECTION 4.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after its passage.